Massachusetts, session 194th, H5621.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Chapter 6 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 
2 116K the following section:- 
3  Section 116L. (a) The municipal police training committee, in consultation with the 
4 executive office of aging and independence, the Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders 
5 Association, Massachusetts Chapter, Inc., the Massachusetts Coalition of Police, Inc., 
6 Massachusetts Chiefs of Police Association and the Massachusetts Police Association, Inc., shall 
7 establish and implement a dementia training program for law enforcement officers. The 
8 committee may consult with other appropriate organizations and agencies with an interest and 
9 expertise in Alzheimer’s disease and other dementias, or those representing or working with first 
10 responders. The dementia training program shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) 
11 instruction on the identification of people with Alzheimer’s disease and other dementias; (ii) 
12 risks such as wandering and elder abuse; and (iii) the best practices for interacting with people 
13 with Alzheimer’s disease and other dementias. 

2 of 16 14  (b) All law enforcement officers shall complete not less than 2 hours of initial training on 
15 dementia within the recruit basic training curriculum. The 2-hour dementia training program 
16 shall provide training on: 
17  (i) dementia and symptoms associated with dementia; 
18  (ii) communication issues, including how to communicate respectfully and effectively 
19 with the individual who has dementia to determine the most appropriate response and effective 
20 communication techniques to enhance collaboration with caregivers; 
21  (iii) techniques for understanding and approaching behavioral symptoms and identifying 
22 alternatives to physical restraints; 
23  (iv) identifying and reporting incidents of abuse, neglect and exploitation to the 
24 protective services system established in section 16 of chapter 19A; 
25  (v) protocols for contacting caregivers when a person with dementia is found wandering, 
26 or during emergency or crisis situations; and 
27  (vi) local caregiving resources that are available for people living with dementia. 
28  (c) All law enforcement officers shall complete not less than 1 hour of biannual in-service 
29 education covering dementia training. The biannual in-service training shall qualify toward the 
30 minimum credit hours required for in-service education. 
31  SECTION 2. Said chapter 6 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 164 the 
32 following section:- 

3 of 16 33  Section 164A.  (a) The fire training council established pursuant to section 164 shall 
34 establish and implement a dementia training program, in consultation with the Massachusetts fire 
35 service commission established pursuant to section 165B, the executive office of aging and 
36 independence, the Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders Association, Massachusetts 
37 Chapter, Inc., the Professional Firefighters of Massachusetts and the Fire Chiefs’ Association of 
38 Massachusetts, Inc., for firefighters. The council may consult with other appropriate 
39 organizations and agencies having an interest and expertise in Alzheimer’s disease and other 
40 dementias, or those representing or working with first responders. The dementia training 
41 program shall include instruction on: (i) the identification of people with Alzheimer’s disease 
42 and other dementias; (ii) risks such as wandering and elder abuse; and (iii) the best practices for 
43 interacting with people with Alzheimer’s disease and other dementias. 
44  (b) All firefighters shall complete not less than 2 hours of initial training on dementia 
45 within the recruit basic training curriculum. The program shall provide training on: 
46  (i) dementia and symptoms associated with dementia; 
47  (ii) communication issues, including how to communicate respectfully and effectively 
48 with the individual who has dementia to determine the most appropriate response and effective 
49 communication techniques to enhance collaboration with caregivers; 
50  (iii) techniques for understanding and approaching behavioral symptoms and identifying 
51 alternatives to physical restraints; 
52  (iv) identifying and reporting incidents of abuse, neglect and exploitation to the 
53 protective services system established in section 16 of chapter 19A; 

4 of 16 54  (v) protocols for contacting caregivers when a person with dementia is found wandering, 
55 or during emergency or crisis situations; and 
56  (vi) local caregiving resources that are available for people living with dementia. 
57  (c) All firefighters shall complete not less than 1 hour of biannual in-service education 
58 covering dementia training. The biannual in-service training shall qualify toward the minimum 
59 credit hours required for in-service education. 
60  SECTION 3. Chapter 6A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
61 section 16GG the following section:- 
62  Section 16HH. (a) There shall be within the executive office of health and human 
63 services a director of dementia care and coordination. The secretary of health and human 
64 services shall appoint the director who shall report to the secretary or their designee.  
65  (b) The director’s duties and responsibilities shall include, but shall not be limited to:  
66  (i) coordinating the implementation of the Alzheimer’s disease state plan pursuant to 
67 subsection (a) of section 16AA; 
68  (ii) coordinating with relevant agencies and departments and the chair of the advisory 
69 council on Alzheimer’s disease research and treatment to support the council’s work and annual 
70 updates to the Alzheimer’s disease state plan; 
71  (iii) coordinating with the department of public health on public awareness efforts 
72 pursuant to section 250 of chapter 111; 

5 of 16 73  (iv) facilitating and supporting coordination of outreach programs and services between 
74 agencies, area agencies on aging, aging services access points established pursuant to the second 
75 paragraph of section 4B of chapter 19A and other community organizations to foster public 
76 awareness and education regarding Alzheimer’s disease and other forms of dementia; 
77  (v) coordinating with relevant state agencies and community organizations to ensure 
78 coordination of services, access to services and a high quality of care for individuals with 
79 dementia and their family caregivers to meet the needs of the affected population and prevent 
80 duplication of services; 
81  (vi) reviewing dementia-related training requirements for professionals required to 
82 receive dementia training, including, but not limited to, healthcare professionals, long term care 
83 professionals, first responders, home and community based services professionals, law 
84 enforcement officers pursuant to section 116L of chapter 6, persons enlisted for the first time and 
85 uniformed members of the department of state police pursuant to section 20A of chapter 22C, 
86 firefighters pursuant to section 164A of chapter 6 and EMS personnel pursuant to section 9C of 
87 chapter 111C on a biannual basis; provided, that the director shall review the hours, frequency of 
88 training and content of training; provided further, that the director shall determine whether 
89 existing training requirements meet the needs of the dementia community; provided further, that 
90 the assessment shall include whether trainings incorporate the latest recommendations from 
91 leading national voluntary or governmental health organizations in Alzheimer’s care, support and 
92 research to ensure trainings are based on expert opinion and include evidence-based curriculum 
93 that result in a high quality of care for people living with dementia; and provided further, that 
94 upon completion of the assessment, the director shall provide recommendations to the 
95 department of public health, the executive office of aging and independence, the advisory 

6 of 16 96 council on Alzheimer’s disease research and treatment, the board of registration in nursing, the 
97 board of registration in medicine and any other appropriate departments or boards for additional 
98 training necessary to adequately support the dementia community; 
99  (vii) collaborating with the commissioner of public health, the secretary of aging and 
100 independence, the board of registration in nursing, the board of registration in medicine and any 
101 other appropriate departments or boards to ensure all professionals required to complete 
102 dementia training are in compliance; 
103  (viii) working with the commissioner of public health to ensure that hospitals are 
104 dementia-capable and in compliance with section 252 of chapter 111; 
105  (ix) identifying and managing grants to assist the commonwealth in becoming dementia-
106 capable; 
107  (x) ensuring collection and reporting of data related to the impact of Alzheimer’s disease 
108 in the commonwealth and work with the department of public health’s behavioral risk factor 
109 surveillance system coordinator in identifying available funds to execute appropriate modules for 
110 critical data collection and research; and 
111  (xi) coordinating with the department of public health to improve public health outcomes 
112 utilizing relevant dementia data. 
113  SECTION 4. Chapter 22C of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
114 section 20 the following section:- 
115  Section 20A. (a) The colonel shall establish and implement a dementia training program, 
116 in consultation with the executive office of aging and independence, the Alzheimer’s Disease 

7 of 16 117 and Related Disorders Association, Massachusetts Chapter, Inc. and the State Police Association 
118 of Massachusetts, for uniformed members of the state police. The department may consult with 
119 other appropriate organizations and agencies having an interest and expertise in Alzheimer’s 
120 disease and other dementias, or those representing or working with first responders. The 
121 dementia training program shall include: (i) instruction on the identification of people with 
122 Alzheimer’s disease and other dementias; (ii) risks such as wandering and elder abuse; and (iii) 
123 the best practices for interacting with people with Alzheimer’s disease and other dementias. 
124  (b) All persons enlisted for the first time in the department shall complete not less than 2 
125 hours of initial dementia training within the recruit basic training curriculum. The program shall 
126 provide training on: 
127  (i) dementia and symptoms associated with dementia; 
128  (ii) communication issues, including how to communicate respectfully and effectively 
129 with the individual who has dementia to determine the most appropriate response and effective 
130 communication techniques to enhance collaboration with caregivers; 
131  (iii) techniques for understanding and approaching behavioral symptoms and identifying 
132 alternatives to physical restraints; 
133  (iv) identifying and reporting incidents of abuse, neglect and exploitation to the 
134 protective services system established in section 16 of chapter 19A; 
135  (v) protocols for contacting caregivers when a person with dementia is found wandering, 
136 or during emergency or crisis situations; and 
137  (vi) local caregiving resources that are available for people living with dementia. 

8 of 16 138  (c) All uniformed members of the state police shall complete not less than 1 hour of 
139 biannual in-service education covering dementia training. The biannual in-service training shall 
140 qualify toward the minimum credit hours required for in-service education. 
141  SECTION 5. Section 25N of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
142 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 7, the words “obstetrics/gynecology” 
143 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- obstetrics and gynecology, geriatrics, 
144 geriatric psychiatry. 
145  SECTION 6. Said chapter 111 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 53H 
146 the following section:- 
147  Section 53I. (a) The department shall require acute care hospitals to allow a family 
148 member or other caregiver for patients with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias, or for 
149 patients exhibiting symptoms of dementia or cognitive impairment, or a patient who presents 
150 with symptoms of dementia or cognitive impairment based on the assessment of the health care 
151 provider overseeing their care in the hospital, to remain with the patient at all times that are 
152 medically appropriate, including, but not limited to, while in the emergency department and 
153 while admitted as an inpatient. Caregivers for patients living with Alzheimer’s disease or other 
154 dementias shall not be required to adhere to restricted hospital visiting hours, unless it has been 
155 deemed unsafe for the patient, family member or caregiver. 
156  (b) The department shall require acute care hospitals to create policies and protocols to 
157 ensure that a family member, caregiver or personal legal representative responsible for a patient 
158 with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementia or a patient who presents with symptoms of 
159 dementia or cognitive impairment based on the assessment of the health care provider overseeing 

9 of 16 160 their care in the hospital is contacted as soon as possible following admission to the emergency 
161 department or hospital if the patient presents to the hospital without a family member, caregiver 
162 or personal legal representative; provided, however, that the hospital shall only contact a family 
163 member, caregiver or personal legal representative: (i) if the hospital has received consent from 
164 the patient, if possible, to do so; and (ii) to the extent consistent with federal and state law or 
165 regulation, and in the reasonable judgment of the hospital. If the patient is incapacitated or not 
166 able to provide consent, a health care provider may share the patient’s information with a family 
167 member, caregiver or personal legal representative responsible for a patient with Alzheimer’s 
168 disease or other dementia as long as the health care provider determines, based on their 
169 professional judgment, that it is in the best interest of the patient.  
170  (c) The department shall require acute care hospitals to create policies and protocols to 
171 ensure that a family member, caregiver or personal legal representative responsible for a patient 
172 living with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementia or a patient who presents with symptoms of 
173 dementia or cognitive impairment based on the assessment of the health care provider overseeing 
174 their care in the hospital is contacted prior to the patient’s discharge to ensure a safe discharge, 
175 including suitable transport from the hospital, and review the discharge plan; provided, however, 
176 that the hospital shall only contact a family member, caregiver or personal legal representative: 
177 (i) if the hospital has received consent from the patient, if possible, to do so; and (ii) to the extent 
178 consistent with federal and state law or regulation, and in the reasonable judgment of the 
179 hospital. If the patient is incapacitated or not able to provide consent, a health care provider may 
180 contact a family member, caregiver or personal legal representative responsible for the patient 
181 with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementia as long as the health care provider determines, based 
182 on their professional judgment, that it is in the best interest of the patient. If a family member, 

10 of 16 183 caregiver or personal legal representative is not able to be contacted or if the patient declines 
184 contact, the patient living with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementia shall meet with a hospital 
185 social worker or other professional who can assess for discharge safety and other supports 
186 needed prior to discharge. 
187  (d) Notwithstanding subsections (a) to (c), inclusive, this section shall not apply during a 
188 public health emergency or state of emergency declared by the governor relevant to the actions 
189 of the hospital. 
190  (e) The department shall promulgate regulations to implement this section. 
191  SECTION 7. The first paragraph of section 237 of said chapter 111, as appearing in the 
192 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the second sentence the following 
193 sentence:- The commissioner shall include data on the racial and ethnic disparities for 
194 Alzheimer’s disease and other dementias, where available, and data pertaining to cognitive 
195 decline and caregiving collected as part of the annual behavioral risk factor surveillance system 
196 survey. 
197  SECTION 8. Said chapter 111 is hereby further amended by adding the following 3 
198 sections:- 
199  Section 250. (a) The department, in consultation with the executive office of aging and 
200 independence, the advisory council on Alzheimer’s disease research and treatment established 
201 pursuant to subsection (b) of section 16AA of chapter 6A and any additional stakeholders as 
202 determined by the department, shall develop a public awareness campaign on brain health, 
203 Alzheimer’s disease and other dementias. The department shall incorporate the public awareness 
204 campaign into existing and relevant public health outreach programs. 

11 of 16 205  (b)(1) The public awareness campaign on brain health, Alzheimer’s disease and other 
206 dementias shall: 
207  (i) educate health care providers on: (A) the importance of early detection and timely 
208 diagnosis of cognitive impairment; (B) validated cognitive assessment tools; (C) current and 
209 emerging treatment options; (D) the value of a Medicare Annual Wellness visit for cognitive 
210 health; and (E) the Medicare and Medicaid care planning billing codes for individuals with 
211 cognitive impairment;  
212  (ii) increase public understanding and awareness of: (A) early warning signs of 
213 Alzheimer’s disease and other types of dementia; (B) the value of early detection and diagnosis; 
214 and (C) how to reduce the risk of cognitive decline, particularly among persons in diverse 
215 communities who are at greater risk of developing Alzheimer’s disease and other types of 
216 dementia; and  
217  (iii) inform health care professionals and the general public of: (A) dementia care 
218 coordination services for those living with Alzheimer’s disease and other dementias; and (B) 
219 other resources and services available to individuals living with dementia and their families and 
220 caregivers. 
221  (2) For the materials for the general public, the department shall provide uniform and 
222 consistent guidance on Alzheimer’s disease and other dementia in nonclinical terms. The 
223 department shall: (i) ensure cultural relevancy and health literacy in developing materials; and 
224 (ii) provide the information to diverse populations who are at higher risk for developing 
225 dementia.  

12 of 16 226  (c) The department shall include the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s 
227 Healthy Aging Program’s modules on subjective cognitive decline and caregiving in the annual 
228 behavioral risk factor surveillance system survey on a rotating annual basis to collect prevalence 
229 data on Alzheimer’s disease and other dementias, track trends over time and analyze data to 
230 direct public health programs and resources. 
231  Section 251. As used in this section, “Healthy Brain Initiative Road Map” shall mean the 
232 federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s collaborative approach to fully integrate 
233 cognitive health into public health practice and reduce the risk and impact of Alzheimer’s disease 
234 and other dementias. 
235  Biannually, the department shall report on the department’s work on the Healthy Brain 
236 Initiative Road Map. The department shall submit the report to the clerks of the house of 
237 representatives and the senate, the joint committee on public health and to the advisory council 
238 on Alzheimer’s disease research and treatment established pursuant to subsection (b) of section 
239 16AA of chapter 6A. 
240  Section 252. (a) Not less than every 5 years, each hospital licensed pursuant to section 51 
241 shall complete an operational plan for the recognition and management of patients with dementia 
242 or delirium in acute-care settings and submit the plan to the department for approval. Not later 
243 than 90 days of receipt, the department shall review the plan and approve the plan or offer 
244 amendments to the plan. Upon final approval of the plan by the department, the hospital shall 
245 implement the plan.  
246  (b) The operational plan shall include: (i) education and training of clinical and non-
247 clinical staff; (ii) providing a dementia- and delirium-appropriate environment; (iii) recognition 

13 of 16 248 of dementia and delirium; (iv) patient management and treatment, including, but not limited to, 
249 how to manage symptoms, treatment protocols and side effect management; (v) transition 
250 planning to improve and provide safe admissions, transfers and discharges, including, but not 
251 limited to, protocols to ensure that patients living with dementia are safe and have a staff 
252 member or caregiver present during discharge or transfer; (vi) advance care planning 
253 information; (vii) caregiver communication and coordination, including, but not limited to, 
254 protocols to ensure that contact to a caregiver has been attempted upon arrival and prior to 
255 discharge if the patient agrees; and (viii) additional recommendations made by the Alzheimer’s 
256 and related dementias acute care advisory committee established pursuant to section 1 of chapter 
257 228 of the acts of 2014 and any additional guidance issued by the Massachusetts Health and 
258 Hospital Association, Inc. or the department. 
259  (c) Each hospital may update the operational plan more frequently as needed. 
260  (d) Each hospital shall provide a copy of its operational plan to the advisory council on 
261 Alzheimer’s disease research and treatment established pursuant to subsection (b) of section 
262 16AA of chapter 6A upon approval. 
263  (e) Each hospital shall provide an electronic copy of its operational plan to each 
264 employee upon approval by the department. Upon request by an employee the hospital shall 
265 provide a printed copy of the plan to its employees, 
266  (f) Each hospital shall keep a copy of the operational plan on file and shall make it 
267 available for review by the public by posting it to the hospital’s website. 
268  SECTION 9. Chapter 111C of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
269 section 9B the following section:- 

14 of 16 270  Section 9C. (a) The department shall establish and implement a dementia training 
271 program, in consultation with the executive office of aging and independence, the Alzheimer’s 
272 Disease and Related Disorders Association, Massachusetts Chapter, Inc. and the Massachusetts 
273 Ambulance Association, Incorporated, for EMS personnel. The department may consult with 
274 other appropriate organizations and agencies having an interest and expertise in Alzheimer’s 
275 disease and other dementias, or those representing or working with first responders. The program 
276 shall include instruction on: (i) the identification of people with Alzheimer’s disease and other 
277 dementias; (ii) risks such as wandering and elder abuse; and (iii) the best practices for interacting 
278 with people with Alzheimer’s disease and other dementias. 
279  (b) All EMS personnel shall complete not less than 2 hours of initial training on dementia 
280 within the recruit basic training curriculum. The program shall provide training on: 
281  (i) dementia and symptoms associated with dementia;  
282  (ii) communication issues, including how to communicate respectfully and effectively 
283 with the individual who has dementia to determine the most appropriate response and effective 
284 communication techniques to enhance collaboration with caregivers; 
285  (iii) techniques for understanding and approaching behavioral symptoms and identifying 
286 alternatives to physical restraints; 
287  (iv) identifying and reporting incidents of abuse, neglect and exploitation to the 
288 protective services system established in section 16 of chapter 19A; 
289  (v) protocols for contacting caregivers when a person with dementia is found wandering, 
290 or during emergency or crisis situations; and 

15 of 16 291  (vi) local caregiving resources that are available for people living with dementia. 
292  (c) All EMS personnel shall complete not less than 1 hour of biannual in-service 
293 education covering dementia training. The biannual in-service training shall qualify toward the 
294 minimum credit hours required for in-service education. 
295  SECTION 10. Section 12G1/2 of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 
296 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “disease”, in lines 2, 6 and 
297 16, each time it appears, the following words:- or other dementias. 
298  SECTION 11. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
299 section 9D the following section:- 
300  Section 9D 1/2. (a) As used in this section, the term “dementia care coordination” shall 
301 mean a proactive care consultation service provided to individuals living with dementia and their 
302 caregiver. 
303  (b) The division shall require all senior care options plans and one care plans to provide 
304 coverage for dementia care coordination services for senior care options and one care members 
305 that have been diagnosed with Alzheimer’s disease and other dementias and provide support to 
306 their caregivers.  
307  (c) Dementia care coordination shall be initiated by a referral from the senior care options 
308 or one care member’s care team. Upon referral, a patient with dementia and their caregiver or 
309 family member shall receive a call from a trained care consultant, who shall provide care 
310 consultation services to the family and develop an individualized family care plan. A summary 

16 of 16 311 of the individualized family care plan shall be provided to the referring care team to be included 
312 in the member’s health record. 
313  (d) Individualized care plans may provide guidance on dementia caregiving strategies, 
314 including, but not limited to, symptom management strategies, communication techniques, 
315 guidance on legal and financial issues, safety recommendations and recommendations for 
316 appropriate community support services. 
317  (e) Senior care options plans and one care plans may contract with community partners or 
318 directly provide dementia care coordination services to their members. 
319  SECTION 12. Section 8 of chapter 220 of the acts of 2018 is hereby repealed. 
320  SECTION 13. Not later than January 1, 2027, the department of public health shall 
321 produce the initial report regarding the department’s work on the Healthy Brain Initiative Road 
322 Map pursuant to section 251 of chapter 111 of the General Laws, inserted by section 8. 
323  SECTION 14. Not later than July 1, 2027, each hospital shall submit to the department of 
324 public health the initial operational plan pursuant to section 252 of chapter 111 of the General 
325 Laws, inserted by section 8.